Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202181-8,300.01
Statute of limitation.

Claims described in subdivision (4) of section 81-8,297 shall be forever barred unless the claim is filed with the Risk Manager within the time period prescribed in section 81-8,318. Claims described in subdivisions (5) and (6) of section 81-8,297 and claims relating to expiration of state warrants shall have no time bar to recovery. Except as provided in section 25-213, all other claims permitted under the State Miscellaneous Claims Act shall be forever barred unless the claim is filed with the Risk Manager within two years after the time the claim accrued.

Laws 2007, LB339, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB255, § 8.